enhu2.foma
# falukéhoz falvakéhoz
define HarmRulehoz §oeoe§ -> o // .#. \"^"* BackVowel \Vowel* "^"  ?* _ .o.
                 §oeoe§ -> e //  Front1UnroundedVowel \Vowel* "^" \"^"* _ ,,
                 §oeoe§ -> ö //  Front1RoundedVowel \Vowel* "^" \"^"* _ ;
define HarmRulehozy §oeoey§ -> o // .#. \"^"* BackVowel \Vowel* "^" ?* _ .o.
                 §oeoey§ -> e //  Front1UnroundedVowel \Vowel* "^" \"^"* _ ,,
# at least one element at the end containing unrounded, at least one tag
                 §oeoey§ -> ö //  .#. \"^"* %^ ?* Front1RoundedVowel \Vowel* "^"  \"^"* _ .o.
                 §oeoey§ -> e //  Front1RoundedVowel \Vowel* "^" \"^"* _ ; 
define HarmRulehozyy §oeoeyy§ -> 0 // .#. ?*  [ Vowel | y ]  "^" _ .o.
                 §oeoeyy§ -> o // .#. \"^"* BackVowel \Vowel* "^" ?* _ .o.
                 §oeoeyy§ -> e //  [ Front1UnroundedVowel | y ] \Vowel* "^" \"^"* _ ,,
# at least one element at the end containing unrounded, at least one tag
                 §oeoeyy§ -> ö //  .#. \"^"* %^ ?* Front1RoundedVowel \Vowel* "^"  \"^"* _ .o.
                 §oeoeyy§ -> e //  [ Front1RoundedVowel | y ] \Vowel* "^" \"^"* _ ; 
define HarmRulehozmely §oeoe2§ -> o // .#. ?* "^" ?* _ ;
# at least one element at the end containing unrounded, at least one tag
define HarmRulehozmagas §oeoemagas§ -> ö // .#. \"^"* %^ ?* Front1RoundedVowel \Vowel* "^"  \"^"* _ .o.
                 §oeoemagas§ -> e // .#. \"^"* BackVowel \Vowel* "^" ?* _ .o.
                 §oeoemagas§ -> e //  Front1UnroundedVowel \Vowel* "^" \"^"* _ ,,
# at least one element at the end containing unrounded, at least one tag
                 §oeoemagas§ -> e //  Front1RoundedVowel \Vowel* "^" \"^"* _ ; 
define HarmRuleonen §oeoez§ -> 0 //   Vowelwithy %^ _ .o.
# rácsaimen
                 §oeoez§ -> o // .#. \"^"* BackVowel Cons* "^" ?* _ .o.
# mécsünken
                 §oeoez§ -> ö //  Front1RoundedVowel Cons* "^" [ \%^* | Cons* %^ ] _ ,,
                 §oeoez§ -> e //  Front1UnroundedVowel Cons* "^"  [ \%^* | Cons* %^ ] _ ;
define HarmRuleoneny §oeoezy§ -> 0 //   Vowelwithyy %^ _ .o.
# rácsaimen
                 §oeoezy§ -> o // .#. \"^"* BackVowel Cons* "^" ?* _ .o.
# mécsünken
                 §oeoezy§ -> ö //  Front1RoundedVowel Cons* "^"  _ .o.
                 §oeoezy§ -> e //  Front1RoundedVowel Cons* "^" [ \%^* | Cons* %^ ] _ ,,
                 §oeoezy§ -> e //  Front1UnroundedVowel Cons* "^"  [ \%^* | Cons* %^ ] _ ;
define HarmRuleonenmely §oeoez25§ -> 0 //   Vowelwithy %^ _ .o.
                 §oeoez25§ -> o //   \Vowel %^ _ ;
define HarmRuleonenmagas §oeoezmagas§ -> 0 //  [ Vowel | Cons y ] %^ _ .o.
                 §oeoezmagas§ -> ö // .#. \"^"* %^ ?* Front1RoundedVowel \Vowel* "^" _ .o.
                 §oeoezmagas§ -> e //   \Vowel %^ _ ;
define HarmRuleonenoe §oeoez31§ -> 0 //   Vowelwithy %^ _ .o.
                 §oeoez31§ -> o // .#. \"^"* BackVowel \Vowel* "^"  _ ,,
                 §oeoez31§ -> o //  BackVowel \Vowel* "^"  _ ,,
                 §oeoez31§ -> e //  Front1UnroundedVowel \Vowel* "^"  _ ,,
                 §oeoez31§ -> ö //  Front1RoundedVowel \Vowel* "^" _ ;
define HarmRuleenkent §ooez3§ -> 0 // .#. \"^"* Vowelwithy %^ ?* _  .o.
                 §ooez3§ -> o // .#. \"^"* BackVowel \Vowel+ "^" ?* _ ,,
                 §ooez3§ -> e // .#. \"^"* Front1UnroundedVowel \Vowel+ "^" ?* _ ,,
                 §ooez3§ -> ö // .#. \"^"* Front1RoundedVowel \Vowel+  "^" ?* _ ;
define HarmRuleenkenty §ooez3y§ -> 0 // .#. \"^"* Vowelwithyy %^ ?* _  .o.
                 §ooez3y§ -> o // .#. \"^"* BackVowel \Vowel+ "^" ?* _ ,,
                 §ooez3y§ -> e // .#. \"^"* Front1UnroundedVowel \Vowel+ "^" ?* _ ,,
                 §ooez3y§ -> ö // .#. \"^"* Front1RoundedVowel \Vowel+  "^" ?* _ ;
define HarmRuleenkentmagas §ooez3magas§ -> 0 // .#. \"^"* Vowelwithy %^ ?* _  .o.
                 §ooez3magas§ -> e // .#. \"^"* BackVowel \Vowel+ "^" ?* _ ,,
                 §ooez3magas§ -> e // .#. \"^"* Front1UnroundedVowel \Vowel+ "^" ?* _ ,,
                 §ooez3magas§ -> ö // .#. \"^"* Front1RoundedVowel \Vowel+  "^" ?* _ ;
